Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 88.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-534
Department of Economic Development; Tourism Promotion.

AGENCY NO. 72 — DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Program No. 618 - Tourism Promotion

FY2007-08FY2008-09GENERAL FUND500,000500,000CASH FUND3,620,1163,426,571FEDERAL FUND est.959,815959,815PROGRAM TOTAL5,079,9314,886,386SALARY LIMIT718,395759,675

There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2007-08 $500,000 General Funds and $108,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2008-09 $500,000 General Funds and $108,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.

The General Fund state aid appropriation to this program shall be used to provide a system of dollar-for-dollar matching grants to area or regional promotional groups for advertising, marketing, and promotional efforts.

There is included in the appropriation to this program $250,000 Cash Funds for FY2007-08 to provide funding for promotional and visitor development activities related to the hosting of an Olympic Team Trial event by a city of the metropolitan class.

Laws 2007, LB321, § 239;

Laws 2008, LB959, § 88;

Laws 2008, LB960, § 189.